Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RIVER WATCH PROGRAM.new text end new text begin $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the clean water fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency for grants to Friends of the Minnesota Valley to enhance and expand the existing water-quality and watershed-monitoring river watch activities in schools in the Minnesota River basin watershed and, in cooperation with Clean River Partners, to provide a river watch program in the Cannon River basin watershed. By February 15, 2027, Friends of the Minnesota Valley must provide a report to the commissioner and the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over environment and natural resources finance and policy and the clean water fund on the expenditure of this appropriation. new text end